Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4086.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section and section 2 of this 2026 Act, “industrial
symbiosis” means the voluntary collaboration among businesses or other organizations to
exchange materials, energy, water and by-products in order to optimize resource use, reduce
waste and enhance economic and environmental outcomes.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop an Industrial Symbiosis
Roadmap for the purpose of promoting voluntary industrial symbiosis activities in Oregon
by:
(a) Identifying and describing industrial symbiosis opportunities;
(b) Studying best practices and technologies;
(c) Analyzing barriers to adoption; and
(d) Recommending key performance indicators to measure progress on achieving indus-
trial symbiosis goals.
(3) Oregon’s industrial symbiosis goals include, but are not limited to:
(a) Supporting and coordinating existing industrial symbiosis efforts;
(b) Facilitating new industrial symbiosis opportunities;
(c) Turning waste and by-products into valued resource inputs;
(d) Reducing waste management costs;
(e) Generating new business opportunities;
(f) Increasing incomes and job opportunities;
(g) Improving environmental performance; and
(h) Driving business innovation.
(4) Not later than May 1, 2027, the department shall submit a report on the roadmap to
the legislative committees or interim legislative committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to economic development in the manner provided in ORS 192.245. The report may in-
clude recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall provide to the four
industrial symbiosis pilot communities listed in subsection (2) of this section technical as-
sistance to:
(a) Facilitate, plan and design industrial symbiosis projects; and
Enrolled House Bill 4086 (HB 4086-B) Page 1

(b) Convene community meetings, identify infrastructure opportunities, complete an en-
gineering and cost feasibility study for at least one priority capital project in each commu-
nity and develop recommendations and next steps for future industrial symbiosis projects.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall provide technical assistance de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section to:
(a) COR Healthy Communities;
(b) Clatsop County;
(c) Klamath County; and
(d) The Port of Morrow.
(3) As soon as practicable, and in no event later than August 31, 2026, the department
shall:
(a) Through an open and competitive bidding process, select an organization or service
provider with expertise and documented experience in industrial symbiosis planning to pro-
vide the technical assistance described in subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Begin providing the technical assistance to all the communities listed in subsection
(2) of this section.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2026 Act are repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 3a. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, for business, innovation and trade, for
the development of the Industrial Symbiosis Roadmap under section 1 (2) of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $900,000 for the
purpose of providing technical assistance to the industrial symbiosis pilot communities listed
in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 5. ORS 451.490 is amended to read:
451.490. The district may, in accordance with the order adopted under ORS 451.485, finance the
construction, operation or maintenance of service facilities for a district by:
(1) Use of funds from a fund established under ORS 280.055 or 451.540 to be repaid by the dis-
trict without interest.
(2) Assessments against the property in the district with or without issuance of bonds authorized
under ORS 223.205, 223.210 to 223.295 and 223.770.
(3) Service or user charges in the district.
(4) Connection charges.
(5) District ad valorem taxes.
(6) Sale of bonds.
(7) Funds obtained under ORS 280.040, 280.050, 280.060, 280.070, 280.080 and 280.090. A district
local option tax adopted under ORS 280.060 shall not authorize a tax in any fiscal year later than
the fiscal year in which the district is subject to dissolution under ORS 451.620 (1) and (2).
(8) For districts providing services authorized under ORS 451.010 (1)(a) or (5), funds ob-
tained through charges imposed for district services, facilities or commodities.
[(8)] (9) Any combination of the provisions of subsections (1) to [(7)] (8) of this section.
SECTION 6. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4086 (HB 4086-B) Page 2

Passed by House March 4, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4086 (HB 4086-B) Page 3